Utah statutes.
32B-4-419.   Unlawful permitting of intoxication.

(1)  A person may not permit another person to become intoxicated or an intoxicated person to consume an alcoholic product in:

(a)  premises of which the person is the owner, tenant, or occupant; or

(b)  a chartered bus or limousine of which the person is the owner or operator.

(2)  A violation of Subsection (1) is a class C misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

